apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="чи/стити__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститиму</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститимемо</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ститимем</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститимеш</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститимете</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститиме</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ститимуть</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стив<b/>би</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стила<b/>б</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стило<b/>б</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стили<b/>б</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стьмо</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сть</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стьте</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щено</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стити</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стив</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стила</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стило</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стили</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стивши</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щен</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
      <e c="fix">
        <p>
          <l>стяч</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__англійський"/>
      </e>
      <e i="yes" c="fix">
        <p>
          <l>стяи</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щу</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стимо</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>стим</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стиш</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стите</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стить</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>стять</l>
          <r>стити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="люб/ити__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ити</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ив</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ила</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ило</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>или</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ив<b/>би</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ила<b/>б</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ило<b/>б</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>или<b/>б</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>лю</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имо</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>иш</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ить</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>лять</l>
          <r>ити<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="любити"><i>люб</i><par n="люб/ити__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="чистити"><i>чи</i><par n="чи/стити__vblex"/></e>
